Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 21.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201071-4844
Uniformity of application and construction.

In
applying and construing the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, consideration
must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to
its subject matter among states that enact this uniform act.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 21.